District of Columbia statutes.
8-1052

Open solid waste facilities prohibited.

No person shall operate an open solid waste facility in the District.

History

Feb. 27, 1996, D.C. Law 11-94, § 3, 42 DCR 7172

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-3452.

Temporary Addition of Section

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 8-1051.